California statutes. Education Code
(c) Whenever a district files an application, the board shall require the district to submit to the board and the State Department of Education a five-year plan for construction and rehabilitation of school facilities, and to obtain the written approval of the department that the plan complies with standards that are established by the department for this purpose to ensure that the applicant district has adequately anticipated its school facilities needs and identified funding sources as necessary to meet those needs. The plan may be adjusted to reflect adjusted growth targets. 

(d) The board shall not approve any application under this chapter after January 1, 1990, unless accompanied by a study examining the feasibility of implementing in the district a year-round multitrack educational program that is designed to increase pupil capacity in the district or in overcrowded high school attendance areas by at least 20 percent. 

(e) The board may waive subdivision (d) or the requirements of Section 17017.7, or both, if a school district demonstrates that these requirements will result in a particular educational or financial hardship to the district. Further, the board shall waive subdivision (d), if it finds that there is clear hardship to a district due to declining enrollment or no growth.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17017.6.

Notwithstanding Section 17017.7, the definition of “substantial enrollment” set forth in that section shall apply only to elementary and unified school districts. For a high school district, “substantial enrollment in multitrack year-round schools,” for the purposes of Section 17017.7, means that at least 30 percent of the pupils enrolled in the high school district are enrolled in multitrack year-round schools, or that 40 percent of the pupils enrolled in public school in kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, within the boundaries of the high school attendance area for which the school district is applying for new facilities are enrolled in multitrack year-round schools. In addition, a high school district shall be deemed to have a substantial enrollment in multitrack year-round schools for purposes of Section 17017.7 if, at the option of the district, the entire high school to be constructed is to operate on a multitrack year-round basis.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17017.7.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, priority for the approval of project funding for new construction under this chapter, shall be as follows:

(1) First priority for construction funds shall be given to school districts with a substantial enrollment in multitrack year-round schools requesting state funding for 50 percent of the cost of a project that would be constructed to operate on a multitrack year-round basis.

(2) Second priority shall be for school districts with a substantial enrollment in multitrack year-round schools requesting state funding for the entire cost of a project that would be constructed to operate on a multitrack year-round basis.

(3) Third priority shall be for school districts without a substantial enrollment in multitrack year-round schools requesting state funding for 50 percent of the cost of a project to operate on a multitrack year-round basis.

(4) Fourth priority shall be for school districts without a substantial enrollment in multitrack year-round schools requesting state funding for the entire cost of a project that would be constructed to operate on a multitrack year-round basis.

(5) Fifth priority shall be for school districts with a substantial enrollment in multitrack year-round schools requesting state funding for 50 percent of the cost of a project that would not operate on a multitrack year-round basis.

(6) Sixth priority shall be for school districts with a substantial enrollment in multitrack year-round schools requesting state funding for the entire cost of a project that would not operate on a multitrack year-round basis.

(b) The board shall not restrict the availability of funding for construction of multitrack year-round schools, from any funding source available to the State School Building Lease-Purchase Fund, but shall make approval of project funding for those projects the first priority in accordance with this section.

(c) “Substantial enrollment,” for the purposes of this section, means enrollment of at least 30 percent of district pupils in kindergarten and grades 1 to 6, inclusive, or 40 percent of pupils in kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, in the high school attendance area for which the school district is applying for new facilities. The calculation set forth in this subdivision, as to a self-certifying district, shall be made by the district, in accordance with any standards governing that calculation that are adopted by the board. The calculation shall be certified by the district to the board and used by the board for the purposes of this section. The self-certifying district shall maintain documentation of the calculation as may be required by the board, and the calculation shall be subject to subsequent audit as the board may direct. If a self-certifying district is found by the board to have materially misrepresented its pupil enrollment pursuant to this subdivision, the board may impose either or both of the penalties set forth in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 17041.2, in accordance with that section.

(d) “Multitrack year-round school,” for purposes of this section, means a school for which the applicant district demonstrates that both of the following criteria are satisfied:

(1) The pupils are divided into three or more groups or tracks, which rotate attendance so that, for a majority of schooldays during the school year, at least one group or track is not attending the school while all other groups or tracks are in attendance.

(2) The operation of the school on a multitrack year-round basis has resulted in an increase in enrollment capacity.

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the State Allocation Board may continue to implement any year-round school priority provisions for hardships adopted prior to September 1, 1990.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17017.9.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a project shall be accorded, subject to subdivision (b), the priority status that otherwise is accorded under Section 17017.7 to a project for which state funding is requested for only 50 percent of the cost, if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The applicant district documents to the satisfaction of the board that it has incurred bonded indebtedness in an amount not less than 95 percent of the bonding capacity of the district. “Bonded indebtedness” for the purposes of this section includes, but is not limited to, funding provided pursuant to Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 53311) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(2) The applicant district agrees that up to 95 percent of the unexpended bonding capacity of the district, existing on or after the date of the district’s first application for project funding pursuant to this section, shall apply toward the cost of projects.

(3) Either of the following apply:

(A) The applicant district agrees that developer fees imposed pursuant to Section 17620 shall apply toward the cost of projects for which the district requests state funding pursuant to this chapter, not to exceed 50 percent of the cost of any project. Fees needed for interim housing for capital outlay purposes for modernization and new construction projects, school district administration capital outlay projects, and capital outlay projects for transportation needs, are exempt from this requirement.

(B) The applicant is a school district with an average daily attendance of 2,500 or less.

(b) An applicant district qualifying for the priority status described in subdivision (a) as to any project shall continue to be accorded that status for all subsequent projects under this chapter until the time that the bonding capacity of the district determined for purposes of that subdivision increases by 20 percent.

(c) The condition set forth in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) shall apply until either the applicant district’s eligibility under this section terminates pursuant to subdivision (b), or funding for the district is approved and apportioned under this chapter for a project for which 50 percent or more of the cost is provided by the district from funding sources other than any state program administered by the board, whichever occurs first.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, as to any project for which priority status is accorded pursuant to subdivision (a), the estimate of average daily attendance for the applicant district may be calculated, upon request of the district, in the manner set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 17040.3.

(e) The board may recalculate program allowances and apportionments pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 957, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

17018.

In approving applications pursuant to this chapter, the board shall encourage the design and construction of facilities which will conserve unreplenishable energy resources by consideration of alternate design and insulation concepts as well as unconventional energy sources. In so doing, the board may increase cost allowances to reflect the difference between conventional and unconventional concepts when the board is satisfied that the life cycle cost of the project is not expected to exceed the life cycle cost of a conventionally designed project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17018.5.

(a) The Legislature intends for the board to encourage school districts to utilize alternative methods to fund school facilities.

(b) The board shall approve applications pursuant to the requirements of this section that request the board to share a portion of the cost of projects constructed pursuant to the Mello-Roos Community Facilities Act of 1982, as set forth by Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 53311) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code. The board shall disregard the fact that structures have been constructed in accordance with that act, and neither consider nor approve any application for cost sharing until the time that the applicant school district would have become eligible for approval of its application during the normal process established for considering and approving applications.

(c) The board shall approve applications for cost sharing based on both of the following factors:

(1) Estimates of average daily attendance at the time the application is considered.

(2) The amount of cost sharing requested.

(d) The costs shared by the board shall be an amount equal to the cost that would have been allowed for the project had it been originally approved pursuant to this chapter less 5 percent per year depreciation, exclusive of land, for each year that the project was constructed in advance of the application approval, but no more than the lesser of an amount equal to 75 percent of the allowable cost of the project or the principal amount of any outstanding callable bonds and other debts incurred to finance the project under the Mello-Roos Community Facilities Act of 1982.

(e) If the board utilizes a point system to prioritize applications for funding, the computation of priorities for an application pursuant to this section shall be increased by 4 percent for each year from the date of construction of the project to the date of approval of the cost-sharing application.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17018.7.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a school district that has, within the previous 24-month period, constructed or otherwise acquired school facilities with 100 percent local funding, may apply for funding for the construction of a gymnasium or multipurpose room on the site where it constructed or otherwise acquired school facilities with 100 percent local funding.

(b) If the State Allocation Board determines that the schoolsite does not have adequate gymnasium or multipurpose room facilities, the board may approve the application pursuant to this section.

(c) For an application approved pursuant to this section, the board shall grant the school district a credit against its local matching share requirement of up to 50 percent of the costs of the project or the total local funds expended by the school district on any school facilities funded by 100 percent local funds within the immediately preceding 24-month period, whichever is less.

(d) For an application approved under this section, the project shall be accorded the priority status that is otherwise accorded under Section 17017.7 to a project for which state funding is requested for only 50 percent of the costs.

(e) As used in this section “100 percent local funding” includes construction or acquisition of a school facility with 40 percent funding from the general fund of the school district and with the remainder of the local funding from the sale of surplus school property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 941, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

17019.

Before the board approves any project that includes the acquisition of furniture or equipment, it shall establish current cost and quality standards for furniture and equipment, including, but not limited to, educational technology hardware. The standards shall not exceed the cost and quality of furniture and equipment for comparable facilities purchased by school districts in the same area. The standards shall consist of furniture and equipment costs for each type of classroom or pupil station having different cost criteria. The standards shall be reviewed quarterly by the board and adjustments made in accordance with actual current costs. When cost and quality standards have been adopted by the board, the standards shall not be exceeded unless a subsequent increase in actual current costs warrants an adjustment.

Before the board approves a project for the replacement, reconstruction, or alteration of, or addition to, a school building, full consideration shall be given to all usable furniture and equipment existing in the applicant district. The board may approve all or a portion of the amount applied for.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17019.3.

(a) Any applicant school district may contract with a firm, as defined in Section 4525 of the Government Code, for construction project management services to assist in the development or implementation of a project for which the district has applied for funding under this chapter, subject to the requirement that a performance bond be required from all building contractors hired to construct the project in order to ensure the completion of performance under the contract.

(b) That portion of any contract, as described in subdivision (a), concerning the final phase of construction of the project, shall be submitted by the applicant district to the board for approval. If the board does not approve, reject, or recommend modifications to, that contract portion within 15 business days after receiving that contract information, that portion of the contract shall be deemed to be approved by the board.

(c) From the amount of funding approved by the board under this chapter for any project, the board shall authorize the expenditure of funds for the costs of construction project management services provided to the project, as described in subdivision (a), where the board finds that the contracting for those services was necessary and appropriate to the school district’s development or implementation of that project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17019.5.

For a school district having an average daily attendance of 2,500 or less for the prior fiscal year, the board may approve, subject to the building cost standards established under this chapter, a supplemental apportionment up to five thousand five hundred dollars ($5,500) for any new construction project, and up to one thousand three hundred twenty dollars ($1,320) for any other project approved under this chapter, as reimbursement for administrative expenses incurred by the district in filing the application for the project. The amount of the supplemental apportionments shall be adjusted in 1990, and every two years thereafter, by the board at its January meeting, which adjustment shall be in an amount equal to the amount of the adjustment for inflation set forth in the statewide cost index for class D construction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17020.

(a) Notwithstanding other provisions of this chapter, in order to expedite a total school facility a school district may first apply for a project which includes only the advance purchase of the land and preparation of plans and specifications. The acquisition of the site and the plans preparation shall be based on the justification documents for the total school facility. The school district may apply for a subsequent project or projects to complete the total school facility.

(b) Any application filed pursuant to this section shall be subject to all provisions of this chapter generally applicable to project applications, to the extent not in conflict with this section.

(c) Any estimate of average daily attendance made by an applicant district for the purpose of justifying an application pursuant to this section may be made for up to and including two years longer than the period of time permitted by Section 17040.

(d) Beginning in the fifth fiscal year following the fiscal year in which any apportionment is made to a school district pursuant to this section, the district shall repay the apportionment, with interest, in 10 equal annual installments, unless and until the district has qualified for an apportionment pursuant to an application for utilization of the site under this chapter. These repayments shall constitute rent, and shall be in addition to any other rents or fees for which the district is obligated under Section 17032. The board may waive any obligation of repayment under this subdivision to the extent that the board finds that the obligation will result in an extreme hardship upon the district.

(e) The school district may apply for a subsequent project or projects to complete the total school facility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17021.

No project shall be approved for the reconstruction, modernization, or replacement of any school building that was constructed or reconstructed less than 30 years, or, in the case of any portable classroom, as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 17042.5, less than 20 years, prior to the date of approval of the project applied for under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17021.3.

(a) For purposes of this chapter, “modernization” or “renovation” means any modification of an existing structure, the costs of which do not exceed 25 percent of the replacement cost of that structure. 

(b) No project shall be approved for the modernization of any school facility unless and until both of the following are demonstrated to the satisfaction of the board:

(1) The project will enhance the capacity of the facility to achieve one or more educational purposes. 

(2) The resulting pupil capacity of the facility, as measured in units of average daily attendance, will equal or exceed 80 percent of the facility’s maximum capacity as determined under the board standards established under this chapter. 

(c) No project shall be approved for the modernization of any school facility that was constructed less than 30 years prior to the date of the approval of the project applied for under this chapter. 

(d) The State Allocation Board may waive the requirement in subdivision (c) if the building has been declared by the Office of the State Architect to be, or is in imminent danger of becoming, a health or safety hazard to the pupils. This determination may only be made in the case of a natural disaster, for example, fire, flood, or earthquakes, or as a result of a determination by a qualified engineer, and agreed to in writing by the Office of the State Architect.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17021.4.

Notwithstanding the limitation set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 17021.3, the costs of a modernization or renovation project funded under this chapter may exceed 25 percent of the replacement cost of an existing structure where the costs in excess of that amount are funded by the district exclusively from sources other than any state program administered by the board. For each project, the total costs of the modernization or renovation project, as supplemented pursuant to this section, may not exceed 50 percent of the replacement cost of the existing structure except to the extent of those costs funded by the district, from sources other than any state program administered by the board, that are expended to conform that structure to current building standards, in which event the total costs of the project may not exceed 75 percent of the replacement cost of the structure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17022.

Except as provided in Section 17041, the board shall not approve any new school facilities for any applicant school district or county superintendent of schools until it first has made a determination that the applicant will utilize all existing facilities and sites to the extent economically and practically feasible. The board may also require the applicant to explore cooperative efforts with adjacent districts or, in the case of county superintendents of schools, with adjacent county superintendents of schools, in order that all existing or planned facilities in the general area of need shall be utilized.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17022.7.

(a) The funding for any reconstruction project approved by the board pursuant to this chapter that meets the requirements set forth in subdivision (b) shall include all of the following, not to exceed the total cost of the reconstruction project or 75 percent of the replacement cost of the facility to be reconstructed, whichever is less:

(1) Twenty-five percent of the replacement cost of the facility.

(2) A funding entitlement to the extent that the reconstruction will result in an increased capacity of the facility to house pupils, calculated pursuant to the cost standards for new construction established by the board under Section 17017.

(3) Any costs incurred by the district as required to ensure that the facility, as reconstructed, complies with applicable structural safety standards for school buildings pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 17280) and Article 6 (commencing with Section 17365) of Chapter 2 of Part 10.5, and Article 7 (commencing with Section 81130) and Article 8 (commencing with Section 81160) of Chapter 1 of Part 49.

(b) In order to qualify for the funding entitlement set forth in subdivision (a), a school district reconstruction project shall be required to meet all of the following conditions:

(1) The facility to be reconstructed is at least 30 years old as of the date the application is filed.

(2) The cost of the reconstruction project exceeds 25 percent of the replacement cost of the facility.

(3) The reconstruction will result in an increased capacity of the facility to house pupils.

(c) No reconstruction project shall be approved under this chapter for which the total cost exceeds 75 percent of the replacement cost of the facility to be reconstructed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17023.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed as changing the powers and duties of the Department of Education or the Department of General Services in respect to schoolsites and the construction of school buildings as contained in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17211) and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 17251) of Part 10.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17024.

(a) The board shall not authorize the selection of any schoolsite, or a contract for the construction of any new school building, or for any addition to, or alteration of, any existing building, for lease-purchase to any school district, unless the applicant district has obtained the written approval of the State Department of Education that the site selection, and the building plans and specifications, comply with the standards adopted by the department pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c), respectively, of Section 17251.

(b) A self-certifying district shall comply with subdivision (a) by certifying to the State Department of Education and the board that the site selection, and the building plans and specifications, comply with the standards adopted by the department pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c), respectively, of Section 17251. The self-certifying district shall maintain documentation of the determinations made pursuant to this subdivision as required by the board. Those determinations shall be subject to subsequent audit by the State Department of Education in accordance with this section. 

(c) The State Department of Education shall conduct random audits of the information certified by self-certifying districts pursuant to subdivision (b), using generally accepted auditing principles, at any time to ensure compliance with the law. 

(d) If any information certified by a self-certifying district pursuant to subdivision (b) is found by the department to contain any material inaccuracy, the department shall so notify the board. The board shall thereupon impose both of the following penalties:

(1) Pursuant to a repayment schedule approved by the board of no more than five years, the district shall repay to the board, for deposit in the State School Building Lease-Purchase Fund, an amount equal to the amount of project funding allocated under this chapter to acquire any site that was selected in material violation of the standards adopted by the department pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 17251, together with interest at the rate paid on moneys in the Pooled Money Investment Account or at the highest rate of interest for the most recent issue of state general obligation bonds as established pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code, whichever is greater. The amount of any repayment owing under this paragraph for any fiscal year, which is not repaid otherwise by the district, shall be withheld by the board from any project funding that otherwise would be allocated to that district under this chapter in that fiscal year. As to any repayment obligation remaining for that fiscal year, the board shall notify the Superintendent of Public Instruction, who shall withhold the amount of that remaining obligation from the apportionments to be made to the district from the State School Fund in that fiscal year. 

(2) The board shall prohibit the district from exercising the self-certifying authority under subdivision (b) under any subsequent applications for project funding for a period of up to five years following the date of the finding of a material inaccuracy, or until the district’s repayment of the entire amount owing under paragraph (1), whichever occurs later. 

(e) Any school district against which the board imposed the penalties under paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (d) may submit for binding determination by an arbitrator the issue of whether the penalties imposed are disproportionate to the inaccuracy certified by the district. Except as otherwise provided by this chapter, the procedure governing the arbitration shall be as set forth in Title 9 (commencing with Section 1280) of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure. 

(f) It is the intent of the Legislature that audits as described in this section not interfere with the application and construction process under this chapter unless one or more violations are discovered.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17024.5.

Upon request of any school district, the State Department of Education shall provide assistance in the evaluation and utilization of existing school facilities and the justification of the need for schoolsites, new facilities, and the rehabilitation or replacement of existing facilities, in accordance with board regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17025.

(a) The board shall not authorize a contract for the construction of any new school, or for the addition to, or reconstruction or alteration of, any existing building, for lease-purchase to any school district unless the applicant district has submitted plans therefor to the Department of General Services and obtained the written approval of the department pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 17280) of Chapter 3 of Part 10.5.

(b) The board, or the self-certifying district, as applicable, shall certify the compliance of a project with Sections 17212, 17212.5, and 17213, with Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code, and with any other law that applies to that project, but may require documentation of compliance only as to requirements that are applicable under this chapter. Notwithstanding any other law, for purposes of Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code, the applicant district shall be deemed to be the “lead agency” with regard to any project funded for that district under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17029.

(a) The board shall authorize the applicant school district to act as its agent in the performance of acts specifically approved by the board and all acts required pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 17280) of Chapter 3 of Part 10.5. That authorization shall include, but is not limited to, the selection of schoolsites, the securing of appraisals, the contracting for architectural services, the advertisement for construction bids and the entering into of contracts therefor and the purchase of furniture and equipment.

(b) If, pursuant to the authority granted under subdivision (a), a self-certifying district submits to the board two or more independent appraisals and certifies to the board that the appraisals were performed by appraisers licensed or certified in accordance with Part 3 (commencing with Section 11300) of Division 4 of the Business and Professions Code and were obtained in accordance with standards and procedures imposed by the board for that purpose, the district shall not be required to document its compliance with those standards and procedures except as specified in Section 17041.2. In addition, the board shall use any of those appraisals, including an appraisal that is not the highest bid appraisal, for the purposes of this section, except that the board may substitute, for the results of those appraisals, the results of one or more independent appraisals, which may include an appraisal performed by the Department of General Services, obtained by the board for that purpose. 

(c) If, pursuant to the authority granted under subdivision (a), any bid reported to the board by a self-certifying district as the lowest responsible bid for a construction contract does not exceed the cost limit established by the board for that purpose, and the district certifies to the board that the bid was obtained in accordance with standards and procedures imposed by the board for that purpose, the district shall not be required to document its compliance with those standards and procedures except as specified in Section 17041.2.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17029.5.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, the funding by the board of contracts entered into by a school district pursuant to this chapter shall not, in itself, make the board liable for any tort, breach of contract, or any other action for damages caused by a school district arising from those contracts. These contracts include, but are not limited to, contracts between the school district and its construction contractors, construction managers, architects, or engineers. The school district shall be liable for all torts, breaches of contract, or any other actions for damages caused by the school district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17030.

(a) In expending funds for any project under this chapter, a school district acts as an agent of the state and all sites purchased and improved, all equipment purchased, and all buildings constructed, altered or added to through the expenditure of funds apportioned under this chapter, are declared to be, and are, the property of the state.

(b) The Director of General Services shall file with the county recorder of the county in which any site purchased or improved through the expenditure of funds under this chapter is located a certificate, properly acknowledged, indicating the state’s interest in real property of the district by virtue of this section, without the necessity of particularizing the real property. The recorder shall record and index the certificate in the same manner as abstracts of judgments and the certificate shall constitute constructive notice of the state’s interest in the particular real property affected. The certificate shall, as to any party thereafter acquiring real property or any interest therein in the county from the school district, have the same force, effect and priority as if it had been a judgment lien imposed upon real property which was not exempt from execution. That effect shall commence upon recordation and shall continue until the certificate is discharged or released as provided herein.

(c) Upon request, the Director of General Services shall issue either of the following:

(1) A release of the state’s interest in any real property or a portion thereof that the district has been authorized by the board to dispose of under Section 17039, provided that delivery of such release may be subject to such conditions as may be prescribed by the board to protect the state’s interest.

(2) A disclaimer of the state’s interest in any real property or a portion thereof of the district, the disposition of which the board is not required to consent to under the terms of Section 17039, provided that the delivery of such disclaimer may be subject to such conditions as the board deems appropriate to protect the interest of the state, including conditions relating to the amount of consideration to be received from the disposition where the board asserts an interest in the proceeds of such disposition under other provisions of this chapter. The release or disclaimer shall conclusively protect any third party relying upon the same and shall be acknowledged to permit recordation by the county recorder.

(d) Upon payment by the district of all amounts required to be paid by it, or on its behalf, to the state under this chapter, each of the following shall occur:

(1) The Director of General Services shall file with the county recorder a release of any certificate, which release shall be recorded and indexed in the same index as the certificate.

(2) The title to personal property purchased by the school district with funds apportioned under this chapter shall revert thereto without further action by the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17030.2.

Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary, all lease agreements shall terminate 40 years from the date of execution and title to the property covered therein shall revert to the district as though full payment had been made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17030.3.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, any project funded under this chapter that involves only the identification, assessment, or abatement of hazardous asbestos in school facilities shall not be subject to Section 17014 or 17032, nor shall that funding cause the transfer to the state of title or any other property interest in the subject facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17030.5.

Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, no funds authorized by any act for the purpose of this chapter may be expended for any purpose without specific authorization from the board or its designated representatives.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17030.6.

From any moneys in the State School Building Lease-Purchase Fund, the board shall make available to the Director of General Services such amounts as it determines necessary to provide the assistance, pursuant to this chapter, required by Section 15504 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17031.

The applicant district, acting as agent for the state, shall comply with all laws pertaining to the construction, reconstruction, or alteration of, or addition to school buildings.
